District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

8-105.73

District of Columbia Flood Assistance Fund.

[Expired].

History

Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-293, § 4, 60 DCR 2613

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-105.71 and § 8-105.72.